Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Article 2. Community College Commission
§ 21-18-204.
Commission and districts subject to public records provisions; Uniform Municipal Fiscal Procedures Act.

The commission and the community college districts are subject to the provisions of W.S.

16-4-201

through

16-4-205

.

The community college districts are subject to the provisions of the Uniform Municipal Fiscal Procedures Act. Audits for each community college required by W.S.

16-4-121

shall be performed by independent auditors selected by the college. The audits shall be conducted in accordance with guidelines set forth in W.S.

9-1-507

. The independent auditors shall submit audit findings to the college board of trustees, the commission and the state budget department. Questions by the commission regarding audits shall be submitted to the community colleges for response.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 252, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 21-481.3; Laws 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21-3-213; W.S. 1977, § 21-18-213; Laws 1985, ch. 208, § 3; 1995, ch. 199, § 1; 2000, ch. 73, § 1; 2021 ch. 56, § 3, effective April 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendment,

in the third sentence of (b), added "state" preceding "budget," deleted "division of the" preceding "department" and "of administration and information" at the end.

Laws 2021, ch. 56, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 1, 2021.

Editor's notes. —

Former §

21-18-204

was renumbered by Laws 1985, ch. 208, § 4, effective July 1, 1985. For present provision, see §

21-18-302

.

§ 21-18-205.
Appropriation and distribution of state funds; restrictions; budget authority.

To qualify for state funding, a community college shall:

Be accredited academically by the regional accrediting agency; and

Provide for a levy of four (4) mills on the taxable valuation of the district for the regular support and operation of the community college in the year for which the appropriation is requested.

A biennial funding report shall be provided by each community college to the community college commission at the beginning of each biennium in a form and format determined by the commission. Any amendments to the report shall be provided to the commission immediately after adoption by the board.

State funding for the assistance of community colleges shall be appropriated to the community college commission unless otherwise specified by law. Subject to the provisions of this section, funds appropriated for each biennium shall be distributed by the commission to community colleges in amounts determined by a funding allocation model adopted by rule of the commission. Funding allocation model components for fixed and variable costs shall be defined by and computed in accordance with guidelines and procedures prescribed by rule and regulation of the commission, applied to the distribution of state appropriations for each biennial budget period and reallocated at a schedule specified by rule and regulation of the commission, but in no event less than once every four (4) years. The commission may maintain a contingency reserve account utilizing any revenue derived under W.S. 9-4-601(b)(iv)(A) to be distributed as a component of the funding allocation model for specific use by the colleges for emergency repairs and preventive maintenance.

through (iv) Repealed by Laws 2000, ch. 33, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 2000, ch. 33, § 2.

The commission may by exception budget, request additional state funding to be designated as special purpose funding, accounted for and distributed separately from distributions under the funding allocation model. Special purpose funding under this subsection shall be limited to amounts and for the period of time specified by the legislature and shall not be included in any subsequent biennial budget unless specifically requested by the commission and approved by the legislature. Funds appropriated pursuant to this subsection shall be distributed in amounts and at times determined by the commission, subject to the following:

Special purpose funding, accounted for separately, to be designated as adjustments to funding allocation model distributions for the effects of enrollment growth shall not be transferred to or expended for any other purpose. Any amount of this special purpose funding request remaining unexpended or unencumbered at the end of the budget period for which appropriated shall revert according to law;

Special purpose funding may be requested under this subsection for use by the commission in funding new programs addressing unanticipated and emerging statewide needs during the biennial budget period which are consistent with the statewide community college system strategic plan. Funds appropriated by the legislature for purposes of this paragraph shall be accounted for separately and shall not be transferred or expended for any other purpose or as part of state assistance under subsection (c) of this section. Any unexpended or unencumbered amount of special purpose funding under this paragraph remaining at the end of the budget period for which appropriated shall revert as provided by law.

Up to fifteen percent (15%) of each community college’s unrestricted operating funds for a biennium may be carried forward into the next biennium by each community college. The cumulative total amount of unrestricted operating funds carried forward from previous bienniums shall never exceed fifteen percent (15%) of the community college’s current biennium unrestricted operating funds. Funds carried forward in accordance with this subsection shall not lapse pursuant to W.S.

9-4-207

.

No state funds shall be used for the maintaining, operating or equipping of any capital construction project in excess of one million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000.00) which was not approved by the commission and authorized by the legislature.

The commission may request funding for and shall distribute funds to colleges as provided in the Wyoming works program. Funds requested for the Wyoming works program shall be requested by an exception budget and designated as separate special funding for the Wyoming works program only. Funds distributed pursuant to the Wyoming works program shall be accounted for and distributed separately from the funding allocation model under subsection (c) of this section and from special funding distributed pursuant to subsection (e) of this section.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 217, § 12; W.S. 1957, § 21-482; Laws 1971, ch. 252, § 2; ch. 267, § 8; 1973, ch. 148, § 1; 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21-3-214; W.S. 1977, § 21-18-214; Laws 1979, ch. 116, § 1; 1985, ch. 208, § 3; 1989, ch. 26, § 1; 1990, ch. 38, § 1; ch. 40, § 1; 1993, ch. 95, § 1; ch. 151, § 1; ch. 220, § 1; 1995, ch. 20, § 1; 1997, ch. 113, § 1; ch. 178, § 1; 2000, ch. 33, §§ 1, 2; ch. 73, § 1; 2007, ch. 45, § 1; 2008, ch. 25, § 1; 2009, ch. 211, § 2; 2019 ch. 42, § 1, effective February 15, 2019; 2019 ch. 176, § 2, effective March 8, 2019.

Cross references. —

As to agreements with university of Wyoming, see §

21-17-108

.

For community colleges property tax, election for increase of tax mill levy, see §

21-18-311

.

As to powers and duties of board under Cooperative Educational Services Act, see §§

21-20-101

to

21-20-111

.

The 2007 amendment,

in (f) substituted “eight percent (8%)” for “three percent (3%)” twice.

Laws 2007, ch. 45, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 15, 2007.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, substituted “one million dollars ($1,000,000.00)” for “three hundred fifty thousand dollars ($350,000.00)” in (g).

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, added the second sentence in (c); in the present introductory paragraph of (e), inserted “by exception budget,” in the first sentence, added the second sentence, added “subject to the following:” at the end and made a minor stylistic change; and added (e)(i) and (e)(ii).

The 2019 amendments.—

Laws 2019, ch 176, § 2, effective March 8, 2019, added (h).

Laws 2019, ch 42, § 1, effective July 1, 2020, in (f) substituted, "fifteen percent (15%)" for "eight percent (8%)" in two places and substituted, "one million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000.00)" for "one million dollars ($1,000,000.00)" in (g).

Effective dates.—

Laws 2019, ch. 176 § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 8, 2019.

Laws 2019, ch. 176 § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 8, 2019.

Editor's notes. —

Former §

21-18-205

was renumbered by Laws 1985, ch. 208, § 4, effective July 1, 1985. For present provision, see §

21-18-303

.

Laws 2000, ch. 33, § 3, requires that the funding allocation model used by the commission for the distribution of funds be adopted by rule of the commission.

Commission authority. —

Clearly, the plain language of former Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§ 21-18-202(a)(vii) and 21-18-205(c)(i) granted broad discretion to the Wyoming community college commission to distribute appropriated funds at times and in amounts to be determined by the commission based upon the amount determined to be necessary to maintain services for the particular college. Wyo. Cmty. College Comm'n v. Casper Cmty. College Dist., 2001 WY 86, 31 P.3d 1242,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 106

(Wyo. 2001).

Salaries. —

Commission's distribution of salary increases according to community colleges' wildly varying budget request methods was in violation of former § 21-18-202(a)(vii) and (xiv); commission was required to establish a uniform accounting method to determine each college's need for salary enhancement funds, and to then distribute the remaining funds pro-rata according to the uniformly-calculated salary requests. Wyo. Cmty. College Comm'n v. Casper Cmty. College Dist., 2001 WY 86, 31 P.3d 1242,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 106

(Wyo. 2001).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Governmental Immunity from Damage Actions in Wyoming — Part II,” see VII Land & Water L. Rev. 617 (1972).

§ 21-18-206.
Paying out appropriations by warrants drawn upon vouchers; application of share to default in payment on revenue bonds.

The state treasurer shall pay out state appropriations for community colleges on warrants drawn by the auditor of the state upon vouchers issued and signed by the director of the commission. If any community college entitled to payment out of any appropriation has defaulted in the payment of interest or principal on any revenue bonds issued by the community college and purchased by the state treasurer, the state treasurer shall withhold from the community college that portion of its share of any state aid or appropriation and shall apply the share to any default which has or may in the future occur. Warrants may be drawn upon the state treasurer by the state investment board certifying the default.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 217, § 13; W.S. 1957, § 21-483; Laws 1971, ch. 183, § 1; 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21-3-206; W.S. 1977, § 21-18-215; Laws 1985, ch. 208, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to passing test on constitutions as prerequisite for degree, see §§

21-9-102

,

21-9-103

.

Editor's notes. —

Former §

21-18-206

was renumbered by Laws 1985, ch. 208, § 4, effective July 1, 1985. For present provision, see §

21-18-304

.

§ 21-18-207.
Cooperative educational services.

The commission shall encourage community colleges and school districts to utilize the procedures provided by W.S.

21-20-101

through

21-20-111

.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 208, § 1; 2011, ch. 176, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to powers and duties of board under the Boards of Cooperative Educational Services Act, see §§

21-20-101

to

21-20-111

.

The 2011 amendment,

substituted “21-20-111” for “21-20-109.”

Laws 2011, ch. 176 § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2011.

Editor's notes. —

Former §

21-18-207

was renumbered by Laws 1985, ch. 208, § 4, effective July 1, 1985. For present provision, see §

21-18-305

.

§§ 21-18-208 and 21-18-209.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered by Laws 1985, ch. 208, § 4.

Cross references. —

For present provisions on bonds of officers and employees, and admission of state high school graduates without examination, see §§

21-18-306

and

21-18-307

, respectively.

§§ 21-18-210 and 21-18-211.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1985, ch. 208, § 5.

Editor's notes. —

Sections

21-18-210

and 21-18-211, which derived from Laws 1967, ch. 217, § 10 and 1971, ch. 252, § 3, respectively, related to the community college commission. For present provisions, see §§

21-18-201

and

21-18-202

.

§§ 21-18-212 through 21-18-215.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered by Laws 1985, ch. 208, § 3.

Cross references. —

For present community college budget and appropriation provisions, see §§

21-18-203

through

21-18-206

.

§§ 21-18-216 through 21-18-219.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered by Laws 1985, ch. 208, § 4.

Cross references. —

For present provisions on community college district boards, annexation of additional territory into district, and election for increase of tax mill levy, see §§

21-18-308

through

21-18-311

.

§ 21-18-220.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered by Laws 1985, ch. 208, §§ 3, 4.

Cross references. —

For present provision on formation of districts, see §

21-18-312

.

§§ 21-18-221 through 21-18-224.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered by Laws 1985, ch. 208, § 4.

Cross references. —

For present provisions on bond issues, see §§

21-18-313

through

21-18-316

.

§ 21-18-225.
College maintenance and capital construction funding.

As part of its administrative functions, the community college commission shall identify community college building needs and develop a prioritized list of community college capital construction projects. The prioritized community college capital construction projects shall be reported by the commission to the state construction department in accordance with subsection (g) of this section. Following review, analysis and study, the state construction department shall forward recommendations for community college capital construction projects to the state building commission. The state construction department shall also submit major maintenance budget requests for college buildings to the legislature in accordance with this section. Major maintenance budget requests shall be based upon the square footage submitted by the commission under subsection (f) of this section and upon a formula adopted by the state building commission, and upon forms and in a format specified by the state budget department. College building maintenance budget requests submitted by the state construction department to the legislature and capital construction budget requests forwarded by the state building commission to the legislature shall include only necessary building square footage:

Required for provision of those education programs comprising the statewide college system strategic plan developed and maintained under W.S. 21-18-202(a)(v); and

For major maintenance, exclude student housing, student unions and auxiliary services areas funded exclusively through college generated revenues.

To carry out this section and in accordance with rules and regulations of the state building commission promulgated under W.S. 9-5-107(d) and (e) serving as guidelines for implementation and administration of this section, the commission shall establish and maintain:

A statewide community college building data base comprised of building inventory, specific building condition, square footage, usage, space utilization and building capacity data;

Statewide planning and reporting criteria and guidelines for use by community college districts in developing and maintaining comprehensive long-range plans for district building needs as required under W.S. 21-18-304(a)(xi), providing necessary guidance to college districts for separating future building space needs and requests attached to the statewide college system strategic plan from other district space requests;

Methodologies for use by community college districts in computing future student enrollments, building space demands and future building needs in establishing long-range plans addressing district building needs;

Methodologies which require a seven (7) year phase-in period for major maintenance following the new construction of a community college facility. The phase-in period shall be as follows:

Year one (1) – zero percent (0%);

Year two (2) – ten percent (10%);

Year three (3) – ten percent (10%);

Year four (4) – forty percent (40%);

Year five (5) – sixty percent (60%);

Year six (6) – eighty percent (80%);

Year seven (7) and thereafter – one hundred percent (100%).

The commission shall conduct and maintain a comprehensive assessment of community college buildings and future space requirements as defined by the statewide strategic plan. The comprehensive building assessment shall be designed and maintained to provide timely and uniform statewide data on building condition and building longevity and future space requirements. The needs assessment shall be revised annually to reflect current conditions and shall be capable of providing data sufficient to accommodate a five (5) year planning cycle.

On or before November 1 of each year, the commission shall, based upon the assessment performed under subsection (c) of this section and upon facility plans and annual reports submitted by each college pursuant to W.S. 21-18-304(a)(xi), prioritize community college construction needs for the current fiscal year and the succeeding four (4) fiscal years based upon:

Criteria for statewide capacity for education programs aligned to the statewide college system strategic plan;

Analysis of student enrollment changes based upon commission approved enrollment projection methodology, to determine the need for changes in statewide building capacities over time for delivering statewide education program needs identified within the strategic plan;

A methodology and process established by the commission for identifying the most critical building needs.

The commission may modify construction needs prioritized under subsection (d) of this section in any subsequent fiscal year as necessary to address statewide needs as substantiated by data, condition assessments, needs analysis and other information assembled by the commission under this section. Needs receiving a lower priority than previously assigned may be removed or reprioritized by the commission. Construction needs modified under this subsection shall be reported to the state construction department.

In addition to subsection (d) of this section and on or before June 1 of each odd-numbered year, the commission shall report college building square footage to the state construction department as necessary for computation of major maintenance funds for community college buildings. The reported square footage shall be restricted to that square footage necessary for the delivery of education programs comprising the statewide college system strategic plan and exclude student housing, student unions and auxiliary services areas funded exclusively through college generated revenues.

Upon prioritizing community college construction needs under subsection (d) of this section, the commission shall not later than June 1 of each year, report the prioritized list to the state construction department. In accordance with W.S. 9-5-108(a)(ii), the state construction department shall review, analyze and study construction needs prioritized under subsection (d) of this section and conduct necessary value engineering analysis, schematic design review, safety and security assessments and other analysis and review prior to submission of recommendations to the state building commission. The state building commission shall consider and incorporate prioritized construction needs recommendations into legislation requesting necessary funding, developed under W.S. 9-5-108(a)(ii)(J), for submission to the legislature for review, authorization and approval. The legislation shall also include a separate appropriation for contingency costs associated with recommended construction projects and a separate appropriation for administrative costs of the state construction department for management of the recommended construction projects as required by subsection (j) of this section. The state construction department shall submit a separate budget request for project design and planning funds to be available to assist community colleges with costs incurred in developing and providing necessary plans, designs and other information to the state construction department for purposes of this subsection. This request shall also include funds for major maintenance for the square footage reported by the commission under subsection (f) of this section. The state construction department shall consult with the community college commission in developing recommendations under this subsection.

The community college commission shall provide copies of the needs assessment, construction priorities and major maintenance square footage established under this section to members of the legislature on or before December 1 of each year.

Subject to amounts made available by legislative appropriation and to any conditions which may be attached to appropriation expenditures, the state construction department shall distribute state funds for building construction approved and authorized by the legislature. Distributions of state funds for any approved and authorized construction project shall be in accordance with payment schedules established by rule and regulation of the department. Payments by the department shall be contingent upon the receipt of any local district funding as may be required by legislative authorization, or upon receipt of other documentation which may be required by the program certifying the timely receipt of required local district funds for the capital construction project. Payments to districts shall also be attached to prescribed phases of the construction project and the completion of certain project phases. Construction phases for which approval of the program is required shall be specified by the state construction department rule and regulation, clearly prescribing a process for program review and approval of project plans and specifications, project development and project changes and change orders. In carrying out duties under this subsection, the department may execute powers prescribed under W.S. 9-5-108(a)(iii) in coordination with the state building commission and the appropriate community college district. No scheduled payment shall be made by the department without compliance with the prescribed process.

Appropriations for major maintenance shall be distributed by the state construction department to community colleges in equal quarterly installments in amounts determined by the funding formula developed by the state building commission, subject to restrictions imposed on qualifying square footage pursuant to this section. The state construction department shall distribute the first quarterly payment on July 1 of each fiscal year, with the remaining payments distributed on October 1, January 2 and April 1.

Notwithstanding any provision of law enacted prior to January 1, 2014, biennial budget requests submitted for major maintenance funding for community college capital construction facilities authorized by the legislature shall be calculated as provided in this section.

History.

Laws 2009, ch. 211, § 1; 2013 ch. 143, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2014 ch. 2, § 1, effective March 3, 2014; 2016 ch. 105, § 3, effective July 1, 2016; 2019 ch. 42, § 2, effective July 1, 2020; 2021 ch. 56, § 3, effective April 1, 2021.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, rewrote the section.

The 2014 amendment

substituted “program” for “division” throughout the section; in the second sentence of the introductory paragraph of (a), inserted “program within the general services”; in the fifth sentence of the introductory paragraph of (a), inserted “adopted by the state building commission,” inserted “and upon,” and inserted “in”; added (a)(i) designation; added (a)(ii); added (b)(iv); in the last sentence of (e), inserted “construction management program of the”; in the first sentence of (f), substituted “June” for “August,” and inserted “program within the general services”; in the last sentence of (e), added “and exclude student housing, student unions and auxiliary services areas funded exclusively through college generated revenues”; in the first sentence of (g), substituted “June” for “August,” and inserted “program of the general services”; in the second sentence of (g), in the fifth sentence of (j), substituted “department of administration and information” for “division”; in the sixth sentence of (j), substituted “construction management program” for “division”; in (k), substituted “program within the general services division” for “division,” and substituted “state building commission” for “general services division”; and added (m).

Laws 2014, ch. 2, § 2 makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, §
8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2014.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, amended the section generally.

The 2021 amendment,

in the fifth sentence of (a), added "state" following "specified by the," deleted "division of the" preceding "department" and "of administration and information" at the end.

Laws 2021, ch. 56, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 1, 2021.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) or (

l

) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Appropriations. —

Laws 2009, ch. 211, § 7, provides: “[APPROPRIATIONS AND POSITION AUTHORIZATIONS]

“(d) Three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000.00) is appropriated from the general fund to the community college commission to develop and maintain the comprehensive assessment of community college buildings and future space requirements as required under W.S.

21-18-225

(c), as created by section 1 of this act, and to integrate the existing college facilities data base as maintained by the commission with the state facilities data base maintained by the department of administration and information, as necessary to administer W.S.

21-18-225

, as created by section 1 of this act. This appropriation shall be expended only for purposes of this subsection and shall be for the period commencing upon the effective date of this subsection, and ending June 30, 2010.

“(e) One hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000.00) is appropriated from the general fund to the community college commission to develop guidelines and criteria necessary for segregating variable and fixed cost data as used in establishing components and component proportions for the funding allocation model in accordance with W.S. 21-18-205(c), as amended by section 2 of this act. Established guidelines and criteria shall be used by community college districts in reporting cost data to the commission. Guidelines and criteria shall be adopted by the commission in sufficient time to enable use in model computations effective for the biennium commencing July 1, 2010, and ending June 30, 2012. The appropriation under this subsection shall be for the period commencing upon the effective date of this subsection and ending June 30, 2010, shall be expended for purposes specified in this subsection only and may be used for contractual services as necessary to obtain required analytical expertise in carrying out this subsection.”

Effective dates. —

Laws 2009, ch. 211, § 8, makes the act effective July 1, 2009.

Temporary provisions. —

Laws 2013, ch. 143, § 2, directs:

“(a) For purposes of carrying out this act:

“(i) For the period commencing July 1, 2013, and ending June 30, 2014, one (1) full-time position is transferred from the Wyoming community college commission to the construction management division of the department of administration and information. In addition, the construction management division is authorized one (1) additional full-time position. These positions shall be included in the division's standard budget;

“(ii) Effective for the period commencing July 1, 2013, and ending June 30, 2014, thirty-six thousand twentythree dollars ($36,023.00) shall be transferred from the Wyoming community college commission to the construction management division of the department of administration and information to partially fund and support the position transferred under paragraph (i) of this subsection. This position transfer and the associated funding amount shall be included in both the commission's and the division's standard budget;

“(iii) In addition to paragraph (ii) of this subsection and for the period commencing July 1, 2013, and ending June 30, 2014, one hundred eight thousand dollars ($108,000.00) from the community college construction management appropriation within the department of administration and information's 2013-2014 biennial budget shall be available to the construction management division for salary and benefits of the positions authorized under this section. This funding amount shall be included in the division's standard budget.

“(b) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the authority of the governor to effect voluntary transfers of positions between agencies as otherwise authorized by law.”

§ 21-18-226.
State authorization reciprocity agreements; administration; requirements; fees; rules and regulations.

The commission shall enter into an agreement with the Western Interstate Commission for Higher Education to participate, on behalf of the state of Wyoming, with all other states legally joining in the state authorization reciprocity agreement.

The requirements of the agreement shall be sufficient to protect the integrity of Wyoming post secondary education, but shall also allow authorized institutions complying with the agreement the ability to reach as many potential students as possible.

The commission shall review applications from any public or private post secondary institution seeking admission under the state reciprocity agreement if the institution has a physical presence in Wyoming and is organized under the laws of the state of Wyoming. The commission shall:

Admit to the state authorization agreement any qualified public or private applicant that meets the requirements of the state authorization reciprocity agreement pertaining to institutional quality, consumer protection and fiscal viability as defined by subsection (d) of this section;

Monitor compliance of admitted institutions for institutional quality, consumer protection and fiscal viability;

Notify, in a timely manner, the Western Interstate Commission for Higher Education of those post secondary institutions admitted to the reciprocity agreement under paragraph (i) of this subsection and any action taken against an authorized institution pursuant to paragraph (iv) of this subsection; and

Take appropriate action against any authorized institution upon failure to comply with requirements of the state authorization reciprocity agreement, including an investigation, citation, suspension or expulsion from the reciprocity agreement.

For purposes of paragraph (c)(i) of this section, an institution may satisfy:

The institutional quality standard through evidence of current accreditation;

The consumer protection standard through evidence that information required under Title IV of the Higher Education Act of 1965 (20 U.S.C. § 1070 et seq.), as amended, is provided to current and prospective students, and evidence of a procedure for addressing student complaints both internally and through an outside state agency as required by that act;

The fiscal viability standard for public institutions through evidence of adequate public funding, or for a private institution, through evidence that the United States department of education, in its most recent fiscal year report, assigned the institution a financial responsibility composite score of one and five-tenths (1.5) or greater, or a financial responsibility composite score of not less than one (1) if the report covers the most recent two (2) consecutive fiscal years.

The commission may adopt rules and regulations to implement this section.

For purposes of administrating this section, the commission may establish and collect fees from authorized institutions to pay necessary administrative expenses incurred under this section. Any fees collected pursuant to this subsection shall be deposited into the general fund.

As used in this section:

“Accredited” or “accreditation” means the status of public recognition that an accrediting agency recognized by the United States department of education pursuant to Title IV of the Higher Education Act of 1965 (20 U.S.C. § 1070 et seq.), as amended, grants to an institution or educational program that meets the department’s established requirements;

“Educational program” means a program of organized instruction or study beyond secondary education that leads to an academic professional degree, vocational degree or certificate or other recognized educational credential;

“Physical presence” means the ongoing occupation of a physical location in Wyoming for instructional purposes or the maintenance of an administrative office in Wyoming to facilitate instruction. For purposes of this section, the following activities do not constitute a physical presence in Wyoming:

Delivery of distance education courses online;

Advertising;

Recruiting;

Courses delivered on military installations by an accredited institution limited to active and reserve military personnel, dependents of military personnel and civilian employees of the military installation;

Operation of a server or other electronic service device; or

Experiential learning opportunities such as a clinical practicum residency or internship.

“Post secondary institution” means a person, business entity, nonprofit corporation or governmental entity that operates educational programs beyond secondary education;

“State authorization reciprocity agreement” means an agreement, as published by the Western Interstate Commission for Higher Education on November 1, 2013, or substantially similar to the version published on that date, which allows post secondary institutions that meet federal criteria to recruit, advertise, market and conduct distance education across state lines with as few restrictions as possible.

History.

2015 ch. 3, § 1, effective February 17, 2015.